Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.95.080

Washington advanced college tuition payment program account—Actuarial soundness—Adjustment of tuition credit purchases.

The governing body shall annually evaluate, and cause to be evaluated by the state actuary, the soundness of the advanced college tuition payment program account and determine the additional assets needed, if any, to defray the obligations of the account. The governing body may, at its discretion, consult with a nationally recognized actuary for periodic assessments of the account.

If funds are determined by the governing body, based on actuarial analysis to be insufficient to ensure the actuarial soundness of the account, the governing body shall adjust the price of subsequent tuition credit purchases to ensure its soundness.

If there are insufficient numbers of new purchases to ensure the actuarial soundness of the account, the governing body shall request such funds from the legislature as are required to ensure the integrity of the program. Funds may be appropriated directly to the account or appropriated under the condition that they be repaid at a later date. The repayment shall be made at such time that the account is again determined to be actuarially sound.

[ 2016 c 69 s 10; 2011 1st sp.s. c 12 s 3; 1997 c 289 s 8.]